test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23ii_kurkkii_oahpa_gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kurkkii: # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Nom: kurkkii
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Gen: kurkkiin
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Par: kurkkiita
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Tra: kurkkiiksi
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Abe: kurkkiitta
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Ine: kurkkiissa
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Ela: kurkkiista
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Ill: kurkkiisseen
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Ade: kurkkiila
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Abl: kurkkiilta
     kurkkii+N+Sg+All: kurkkiile
     kurkkii+N+Sg+Ess: kurkkiina
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Nom: kurkkiit
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Gen: kurkkiitten
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Par: kurkkiita
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Tra: kurkkiiksi
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Abe: kurkkiitta
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Ine: kurkkiissa
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Ela: kurkkiista
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Ill: kurkkiissiin
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Ade: kurkkiila
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Abl: kurkkiilta
     kurkkii+N+Pl+All: kurkkiile
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Ess: kurkkiina
     kurkkii+N+Pl+Com: kurkkiine
